Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201544-8704
Nebraska Exchange Stakeholder Commission; officers; meetings; quorum; expenses.

(1) The Nebraska Exchange Stakeholder Commission shall organize by selecting a chairperson and a vice-chairperson who shall hold office at the pleasure of the commission. The vice-chairperson shall act as chairperson in the absence of the chairperson or in the event of a vacancy in that position.

(2) The commission shall hold at least three meetings annually, at times and places fixed by the chairperson.

(3) A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

(4) Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 2013, LB384, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB456, § 1.
May 27, 2015July 1, 2017